Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB6278.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 528. (1) An applicant shall ensure that the applicant's application for a special license is received by the commission not less than 45 days before the date the license is desired. If the commission approves the application, the commission shall approve the application not later than 10 days before the date desired by the applicant. (2) Any individual authorized by an organization applying for a special license may sign the application form. (3) Not later than 12 months after the effective date of the amendatory act that added this section, an applicant may electronically submit an application to the commission in a manner determined by the commission. Enacting section 1. R 436.575 and R 436.576 of the Michigan Administrative Code are rescinded.